District of Columbia statutes.
10-214

Annual budget.

The Board shall prepare and submit to the Mayor of the District of Columbia an annual budget itemizing the appropriations necessary for the performance of its functions and duties under this chapter, including appropriations necessary for the purchase of books, literature, newspapers, periodicals, technical reference material, trophies, and medals, and as provided in § 10-224, the Board’s share of the cost of improvement, maintenance, and upkeep of the buildings and grounds used by the Board and which are under the jurisdiction of the Board of Education, the Mayor, or the National Park Service.

History

Apr. 29, 1942, 56 Stat. 263, ch. 265, art. II, § 5

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 8-214.
1973 Ed., § 8-212.

Editor's Notes

Recreation Board abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-201.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.